Massachusetts, session 194th, S2659.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Clause (22) of subsection (a) of section 172 of chapter 6 of the General 
2 Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 133, 
3 the words “2A of chapter 38” and inserting in place thereof the following words: “15 of chapter 
4 18C.”  
5  SECTION 2. Section 6A of chapter 18B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
6 official edition, is hereby amended by striking out the fifth paragraph.  
7  SECTION 3. Said chapter 18B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after 
8 section 6A the following section:-  
9  Section 6B (a) The commissioner or a designee shall appoint an education director who 
10 shall establish an education unit within the department. The director shall appoint, subject to the 
11 approval of the commissioner or designee, the members of the unit called education specialists 
12 who shall be employees of the department and shall devote their full time exclusively to support 

2 of 52 13 the department’s goal of educational stability and success for all elementary and secondary 
14 school students under the care and custody of the department. 
15  (b) The education director’s duties shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) 
16 developing, implementing and overseeing the department’s polices on education for children 
17 under the care and custody of the department, including policy development and guidance; (ii) 
18 monitoring state and federal laws, programs and resources that may impact the education of 
19 children under the care and custody of the department; (iii) advising the commissioner and all 
20 education specialists on all matters relating to education, strategic education initiatives, policy, 
21 and practice management matters; (iv) coordinating efforts of the education specialists to identify 
22 and address systematic barriers to accessing educational services for children under the care and 
23 custody of the department, including issues related to transportation for children in department 
24 care or custody to attend their school of origin; (v) coordinating with the department area and 
25 regional offices on education related issues; and (vi) facilitating best practice training for 
26 educational specialists. The education director shall perform such duties as are described in this 
27 chapter and such other duties as may be assigned by the commissioner.  
28  (c) The focus of the education unit shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) 
29 implementing and overseeing the regional and area office’s work on education for children 
30 receiving services from the department, consistent with the polices created by the department’s 
31 education director; (ii) monitoring student academic progress of children under the care and 
32 custody of the area office nit less than once per academic quarter; (iii) providing support and 
33 assistance to department social workers regarding educational needs of children; (iv) providing 
34 detailed training to department social workers on the best practices to monitor a child’s education 
35 experiences, recognizing any unavailability of resources preventing a child from participating in 

3 of 52 36 school courses, and developing individual education plans or 504 plan; (v) ensuring the 
37 timeliness and accuracy of the transfer of education records detailing a child’s educational 
38 background and needs; and (vi) maintaining contact with the appropriate local school districts 
39 and education organizations to facilitate enrollment, information sharing, and placement of 
40 children into school districts served by the area office.  
41  (d) An education specialist may accompany social workers to meetings with school 
42 personnel, including but not limited to meetings relative to a child’s individual education plan or 
43 504 plan.  
44  SECTION 4. Section 7 of said chapter 18B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
45 striking out subsection (e).  
46  SECTION 5. Section 20 of said chapter 18B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
47 striking out the second sentence.  
48  SECTION 6. Section 23 of said chapter 18B, inserted by section 45 of chapter 176 of the 
49 acts of 2008, is hereby repealed.  
50  SECTION 7. Section 23 of said chapter 18B, inserted by section 8 of chapter 321 of the 
51 acts of 2008, is hereby amended by striking out the sixth sentence.  
52  SECTION 8. Sections 24 and 25 of said chapter 18B are hereby repealed.  
53  SECTION 9. Said chapter 18B is hereby further amended by adding the following 2 
54 sections:-  
55  Section 26. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “legislatively mandated report” 
56 shall mean a report required by law of the department of children and families.   

4 of 52 57  (b) (1) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall issue a report that 
58 provides an overview of the department’s performance during the previous fiscal year. The 
59 report shall also include comparative departmental information from prior fiscal years.  The 
60 commissioner or a designee shall file the report with the governor, the child advocate, the clerks 
61 of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means 
62 and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. The commissioner 
63 shall provide the recipients of the report with an opportunity to discuss its contents with the 
64 commissioner or designee. The report shall be made publicly available on the department’s 
65 website in accordance with section 19 of chapter 66.  
66  (2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, narratives, information, data and 
67 analysis on: (i) counts, including but not limited to: (A) case counts; (B) consumer counts; (C) 
68 consumer demographic information, including age, race, ethnicity, primary language, birth sex, 
69 gender identity, sexual orientation and disability; (D) the number of consumers who have slept in 
70 temporary locations by region, the average length of stay, and any system wide challenges for 
71 finding placement (E) intersectional data; (F) rates of racial disproportionality and disparity at 
72 various decision points throughout the life of a case, including but not limited to; (1) protective 
73 intakes and responses: (2) consumer children 0-17 years of age with an open case as compared to 
74 the proportion of the child population in Massachusetts; (3) the number of children and youth in 
75 placement by placement type; (4) permanency plans for children and youth in placement, 
76 including plans meeting the federal permanency standard; (5) permanency outcome as compared 
77 to children in placement; (6) the median placement length of stay in days for children who exited 
78 care as well as for children who were in out-of-home care; (7) placement moves per 1,000 
79 placement days for children who entered care during the specified fiscal year; (8) exits from care 

5 of 52 80 to reunification, adoption and guardianship as a rate of all exits from placement; (9) youth aging 
81 out as a rate of all exits from placement; (G) the approximate number of requests for reasonable 
82 accommodations; (H) the number of disability related complaints filed with the department; (I) 
83 reports filed pursuant to section 51A of chapter 119; (I) placement metrics including but not 
84 limited to (1) placement moves per 1,000 placement days for children who entered care during 
85 the specified fiscal year; (2) initial placement with kin; (3) the median number of placements 
86 between a home removal episode and an initial placement review; (J) infants brought into the 
87 department’s care pursuant to section 39½ of chapter 119; (K) siblings in placement; (ii) 
88 processes and outcomes including, but not limited to: (A) protective responses and safety 
89 outcomes; (B) the number of fatalities including the manner of death and fatalities by family 
90 history with the department; (C) permanency processes and outcomes, including, but not limited 
91 to, reunification, adoption, guardianship, kinship adoption, kinship guardianship and aging out; 
92 (D) well-being outcomes, including the rates and timeliness of the delivery of medical and 
93 behavioral health services; (E) educational well-being outcomes, including but not limited to: (1) 
94 school placement information; (2) the number of Individualized Education Plans; (3) attendance 
95 rates; (4) high school graduation rates and (5) school disciplinary actions; and (iii) operations, 
96 including but not limited to: (A) staffing trends; (B) caseloads; (C) the department’s budget, 
97 including funding levels; (D) service costs, including but not limited to, departmental foster care, 
98 contracted foster care, complex medical foster care, congregate care, adoption and guardianship 
99 subsidies, foster care support services, respite and support and stabilization; (E) medical services 
100 and advancements in providing medical services to children and young adults in the 
101 department’s care; (F) the number of children and young adults in the department’s care in 
102 emergency departments, inpatient units, psychiatric hospitals, or community-based acute 

6 of 52 103 treatment programs who are awaiting alternate placements and the average duration of days 
104 waiting; (G) cost resources and practices, to reduce overrepresentation of children and youth of 
105 minority populations in the child welfare system due to over reporting; and (J) any new or 
106 ongoing initiatives to improve practices, procedures and policy of the department. The 
107 department may provide additional narrative pursuant to health, mental health, disability and 
108 disproportionality related metrics where numerical metrics are not available. (K) The 
109 commissioner or designee, shall submit a report to the office of the child advocate, house and 
110 senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children, families and persons 
111 with disabilities, and the house and senate clerks’ offices on the number and types of complaints 
112 or alleged violation received pursuant to the Foster Child Bill of Rights, pursuant to section 23D 
113 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 53 of this act. This report shall follow 
114 the filing requirements of subsection (b).  
115  (c)(1) Quarterly, not more than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter, the 
116 department shall issue a quarterly profile on its website in accordance with section 19 of chapter 
117 66 that shall include, but not be limited to, departmental, regional office and area office data on: 
118 (i) consumer counts; (ii) the number of reports filed pursuant to section 51A of chapter 119, 
119 including but not limited to counts of reports received, screened-in and screened-out in total and 
120 by reporter role; (iii) rates and recurrence of maltreatment; (iv) department case counts, including 
121 counts of clinical and adoption cases; (v) consumer demographic information, including age, 
122 race, ethnicity, primary language, birth sex, gender identity and sexual orientation and disability; 
123 (vi) counts of children and youth in placement by type of placement; (vii) counts of children and 
124 youth not in placement.  

7 of 52 125  (2) The commissioner or designee shall notify the house and senate committees on ways 
126 and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities when data 
127 from a profile issued pursuant to paragraph (1) significantly departs from trends reported in 
128 previous profiles.  
129  (d) The commissioner or designee shall notify the joint committee on children, families 
130 and persons with disabilities within one week of a consumer in the department’s custody 
131 sleeping in the department’s area office overnight by region including the average length of stay, 
132 the consumers’ ages, previous placement type and challenge for finding placement.  
133  (e) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special report on 
134 services provided to young adults over the age of 18 with the child advocate, the clerks of the 
135 senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the 
136 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. The report shall summarize 
137 the process by which a young adult may continue to receive services from the department upon 
138 reaching the legal adult age of 18. The report shall also include but not be limited to consumer 
139 demographic information detailing age, race, ethnicity, primary language, gender identity, sexual 
140 orientation, disability and rates of racial disproportionality and disparity but not be limited to: (i) 
141 the number of young adults who have elected to sustain or reestablish a connection with the 
142 department in the previous fiscal year; and (ii) the number of young adults who have elected not 
143 to remain with the department and have transitioned out of the child welfare system in the 
144 previous fiscal year, including young adults who had previously elected to sustain a connection 
145 with the department, if such numbers are available, (iii) the number of transition age youth aging 
146 out with: (1) stable and permanent housing; (2) employment (full or part-time) or military 
147 enlistment; (3) health insurance; (4) if sought, post-secondary education such as college, job 

8 of 52 148 training or certificate program within six (6) months. The department may satisfy the reporting 
149 requirements of this section by providing the requested information in an annual report filed 
150 under subsection (b) of this section.   
151  (f) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special report on its 
152 fair hearing processes and cases with the child advocate, the clerks of the senate and house of 
153 representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
154 children, families and persons with disabilities. The department may satisfy the reporting 
155 requirement of this section by providing the requested information in an annual report filed under 
156 section 26. The report shall be made available to the public electronically in accordance with 
157 section 19 of chapter 66. The report shall include, but not be limited to, information in a form 
158 that shall not include personally identifiable information on the fair hearing requests open at any 
159 time during the previous fiscal year and, for each hearing request, shall provide: (i) the subject 
160 matter of the appeal; (ii) the outcomes of cases resolved prior to a fair hearing decision; (iii) the 
161 number of days between the hearing request and the first day of the hearing; (iv) the number of 
162 days between the close of the evidence and the hearing officer’s decision; (v) the number of days 
163 of continuance granted at the appellant’s request; (vi) the number of days of continuance granted 
164 at the request of the department or the hearing officer, specifying which party made the request; 
165 and (vii) whether the department’s decision that was the subject of the appeal was affirmed or 
166 reversed.  
167  The department shall maintain and make available to the public during regular business 
168 hours, a record of its fair hearings in a form that shall not include personally identifiable 
169 information and that shall include, for each hearing request: (i) the date of the request; (ii) the 
170 date of the hearing decision; (iii) the decision rendered by the hearing officer; and (iv) the final 

9 of 52 171 decision rendered upon the commissioner’s review. For fair hearing requests that are pending for 
172 more than 180 days at any time during the fiscal year, except for those requests which have been 
173 stayed at the request of the district attorney, the report shall provide the number of such cases, 
174 how many of those cases have been heard but not decided and how many have been decided by 
175 the hearing officer but not yet issued a final agency decision.  
176  (g) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special report on the 
177 foster care review system and any recommendations for its improvement, with the child 
178 advocate, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees 
179 on ways and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. 
180 The report shall be made available to the public electronically in accordance with section 19 of 
181 chapter 66. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the department served population, 
182 including but not limited to case counts, child/youth/young adult and parent/caregiver counts and 
183 children/youth/young adults in placement; (2) a foster care review overview, including but not 
184 limited to foster care review policy, numbers of children/youth/young adults in placement with a 
185 convened foster care review and foster care review considerations; (3) scheduling, including but 
186 not limited to scheduled and convened foster care review meetings, children/youth/young adults 
187 reviewed, duration of meetings and timeliness of foster care review report completion; (4) 
188 attendance, including but not limited to foster care review meeting panel composition and 
189 mandated participants invited and attended; (5) the review process, including but not limited to 
190 the department action plan; placement activities; social worker contact; parent-child visitation; 
191 health, education and well-being needs; information on youth/young adults and systemic barriers 
192 for children/youth/young adults and parents/caregivers; (6) foster care review determinations; (7) 

10 of 52 193 minority opinions, including but not limited to minority opinions by panel member and (8) foster 
194 care review follow-up activities.  
195  (h) The commissioner or designee shall notify the joint committee on children, families 
196 and persons with disabilities when draft regulations are made available by the department for 
197 public comment. Not more than 30 days after the promulgation of regulations or the effective 
198 date of adopted or revised departmental policies relative to services provided to children and 
199 families, the department shall provide copies of the regulations or departmental policies to the 
200 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities.  
201  (i) If the department is unable to submit the report under subsection (b), issue the profile 
202 under subsection (i) or any other legislatively mandated reports by the respective deadlines, the 
203 commissioner or the commissioner’s legal counsel shall notify the governor, the child advocate, 
204 the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways 
205 and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities in writing 
206 and provide an explanation for the delay.   
207  (j) The department may satisfy the reporting requirements of this section by providing the 
208 requested information in an annual report as required under chapter 18B.   
209  Section 27. The department, in consultation with the general court, other governmental 
210 and nongovernmental partners, shall establish a 5-year plan that shall include numerical targets 
211 for the department’s performance in each year and in each of its regions in the areas of safety, 
212 permanence and well-being. The plan shall include a description of how the department will 
213 measure its progress toward meeting the numerical targets and may include different targets for 
214 different regions. The department shall update the plan annually.  

11 of 52 215  Annually, the department shall measure its performance in meeting the targets established 
216 in the 5-year plan for the commonwealth as a whole and for each of its regions consistent with 
217 the methodology described in the plan. The department shall publish and maintain on its website 
218 the current plan, the targets for previous years and the department’s performance in meeting 
219 those targets.   
220  If in a fiscal year the department is unable to develop or update the 5-year plan or 
221 measure its performance, the department shall notify the clerks of the house or representatives 
222 and senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on 
223 children, families and persons with disabilities and the child advocate.   
224  SECTION 10. Chapter 18C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
225 Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 1 in its entirety, and inserting in place thereof 
226 the following section:-  
227  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meaning 
228 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
229  “Child advocate”, the child advocate appointed under section 3.  
230  “Child-serving individual,” an individual who, in their professional role, has consistent 
231 access to children and are often alone with children and/or are responsible for their care. A 
232 child–serving individual may be a staff member, a contractor, or temporary employee at a public 
233 or private organization.  
234  “Child-Serving Volunteer,” an individual who, without compensation or expectation of 
235 compensation, provides services or supports in a capacity that involves direct contact with, 

12 of 52 236 supervision of, or responsibility for the care, education, treatment, or welfare of children under 
237 the age of eighteen at a public or private organization. This includes, but is not limited to, 
238 volunteers in schools, childcare programs, youth-serving organizations, recreational or athletic 
239 programs, faith-based programs, mentoring or tutoring services, and residential or congregate 
240 care settings. 
241  “Critical Incident”, (i) a fatality, near fatality, or serious bodily, or emotional injury, of a 
242 child, or the indecent assault and battery of a child in accordance with M.G.L. c. 265 §§ 13B- 
243 13B ¾ and §§ 23-23B, who is in the custody of or receiving services from an executive agency 
244 or a constituent agency; or (ii) circumstances which result in a reasonable belief that an executive 
245 agency or a constituent agency failed in its duty to protect or adequately serve a child and, as a 
246 result, the child was at imminent risk of, or suffered serious bodily or emotional injury or death. 
247  “Department”, the department of children and families.  
248  “Emotional Injury”, occurs when a child of any age witnesses the fatality or life-
249 threatening incident of an individual related to an unexpected medical event, overdose, violent 
250 act, or suicide. 
251  “Executive agency”, a state agency within the office of the governor, including that 
252 provides services to children, including services through contracted providers and through 
253 entities licensed by the state agency.  Executive agencies include the executive office of 
254 education, the executive office of health and human services, and their constituent agencies, the 
255 Massachusetts interagency council on housing and homelessness and the executive office of 
256 housing and livable communities.  

13 of 52 257  “Near fatality”, is an injury that is accidental, the result of a medical condition, or the 
258 result of abuse and neglect and is dependent on verbal certification by a physician that the child’s 
259 condition is considered to be life threatening. 
260  “Office”, the office of the child advocate.  
261  “Sudden unexplained death in pediatrics”, the sudden and unexpected death of an infant 
262 or child, under the age of three, where a cause is not immediately known before investigation.  
263  “Serious bodily injury”, an injury which involves a substantial risk of death, extreme 
264 physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the 
265 function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty or emotional distress.  
266  SECTION 11. Section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
267 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “shall be independent of any supervision or control by 
268 any executive agency” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- shall be an 
269 independent state agency, whose function is to oversee the service executive agencies provide to 
270 children, not subject to the supervision and control of any other executive office, department, 
271 commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the commonwealth.  
272  SECTION 12. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
273 amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (c) 
274 examine, on a system-wide and individual case basis, the care and services that executive 
275 agencies, particularly the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Youth 
276 Services, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Department of 
277 Developmental Services, the Department of Early Education and Care, and the Department of 

14 of 52 278 Elementary and Secondary Education, provide to children through direct services, guidance and 
279 oversight, contracted services and licensing functions; 
280  SECTION 13. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
281 amended by striking out, in line 17, the second time it appears, the word “and”.   
282  SECTION 14. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
283 amended by striking out subsection (e) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
284 (e) examine disproportionality related to topics including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, 
285 disability status, transgender status, sexual orientation or gender identity within child state 
286 systems, services and agencies.  
287  SECTION 15. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
288 amended by adding the following subsection:- (f) partner with executive agencies or other 
289 entities to support pilot programs and expand or improve current programs when, in the child 
290 advocate’s sole discretion, the child advocate determines that such partnership does not 
291 jeopardize the office’s oversight functions and the child advocate determines that such 
292 partnership is in the best interest of the children of the Commonwealth; and 
293  SECTION 16. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
294 amended by adding the following subsection:- (g) provide training and technical assistance to 
295 executive agencies to improve services to children when, in the child advocate’s sole discretion, 
296 the child advocate determines that such training and technical assistance does not jeopardize the 
297 office’s oversight functions and the child advocate determines that such training and technical 
298 assistance is in the best interest of the children of the Commonwealth. 

15 of 52 299  SECTION 17. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C is hereby further amended by striking 
300 out, in line 20, the word “services.” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
301 “services; and”.   
302  SECTION 18. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
303 amended by adding the following 7 paragraphs:-   
304  The office shall create and maintain a website that makes available mandated reporter 
305 trainings, guidance, statutory reference and best practices materials in one online location to all 
306 mandated reporters in the commonwealth. The website shall also contain a list of available 
307 resources for families who need support and guidance on how mandated reporters can connect 
308 individuals or families to those resources. The office shall consult with, or partner with, any 
309 public or private entity that the child advocate deems relevant to create and maintain this 
310 website. The office shall be responsible for ensuring that information on the website remains 
311 current. The office shall collect data on how many individuals access the website. The website 
312 shall be made available to the public within one year of the effective date of this legislation.  
313  The office shall create and make available to the public, on the website created in this 
314 section, evidence-based mandated reporter training for all mandated reporters in the 
315 commonwealth. The training shall include, but is not limited to, training in child abuse and 
316 neglect reporting, technical instruction on how to file a 51A report and details on the 
317 department’s process regarding the filing and treatment of 51A reports, and should address bias 
318 in mandated reporting. Training shall aim to improve the quality of reporting and discourage 
319 reports that do not rise to the relevant statutory standard, including, but not limited to, 
320 information on how to address concerns with families and children when those concerns do not 

16 of 52 321 rise to the level of requiring a maltreatment report, information about connecting families with 
322 needed supports and resources and how to understand what qualifies as neglect.  
323  The office may, as appropriate, expand, update or amend mandated reporter training. The 
324 office may create additional evidence-based mandated reporter trainings for specific groups of 
325 individuals such as educators, childcare workers, social workers and foster parents. The office of 
326 the child advocate may consult, or partner with, any public or private entity that the child 
327 advocate deems relevant to create, update, expand, implement or amend any mandated reporter 
328 trainings the office creates. As needed, the office shall solicit feedback on mandated reporter 
329 training from mandated reporters who have participated in the training created by the office.   
330  The office must include on their website a method that is accessible after the training has 
331 been completed by which members of the public can submit feedback on the training at any point 
332 in time.  Further, the office must include in its annual report data on the use and effectiveness of 
333 the training and the feedback that was collected from the individuals who took the training.   
334  The office shall be responsible for approving curricula for mandated reporter trainings in 
335 accordance with M.G.L. c. 119 §51A(k). Such curricula shall include, but not be limited to: 
336 recognition of the signs of child neglect or abuse and related reporting requirements;  prevention, 
337 identification, and reporting of child sexual abuse and problematic sexual behaviors between 
338 minors;   information on  the ways in which the behavioral and verbal cues for sexual abuse 
339 differ from those of other forms of abuse and neglect; bias and cultural considerations in 
340 reporting; information on how to address concerns with families and children when those 
341 concerns do not rise to the level of requiring a maltreatment report; information about connecting 
342 families with needed supports and resources; and how to understand what qualifies as neglect. 

17 of 52 343  The office shall create a training module or approve curricula for child-serving 
344 individuals and child-serving volunteers. Such curricula shall include, but not be limited to 
345 recognition of the signs of child neglect or abuse;  prevention, identification, and reporting of 
346 child sexual abuse and problematic sexual behaviors between minors;  information on the ways 
347 in which the behavioral and verbal cues for sexual abuse differ from those of other forms of 
348 abuse and neglect; bias and cultural considerations; information on how to address concerns with 
349 families and children when those concerns do not rise to the level maltreatment; information 
350 about connecting families with needed supports and resources; how to understand what qualifies 
351 as neglect, and options for voluntary reporting.  
352  The office shall create and maintain information and a list of resources for parents or 
353 guardians of a child who has experienced a sudden unexpected death in pediatrics. Such 
354 information shall include, but is not limited to, resources to obtain genetic testing, ongoing 
355 bereavement support, counseling, and grief support. Information and resources shall be made 
356 publicly available. 
357  SECTION 19. Section 3 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
358 inserting after the word “health”, in line 10, the following words:- “; the speaker of the house of 
359 representatives, or designee; the senate president, or designee; the house minority leader, or 
360 designee; the senate minority leader, or designee; a person with experience in the child welfare 
361 system to be designated by the Massachusetts Network of Foster Care Alumni; a person with 
362 experience as a foster parent to be designated by the Massachusetts Alliance for Families”.  

18 of 52 363  SECTION 20. Section 3 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
364 striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “child abuse prevention board” and inserting in place 
365 thereof the following words:- Children’s Trust 
366  SECTION 21. The fourth paragraph of said section 3 of said chapter 18C, as so 
367 appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- “The child advocate’s 
368 annual salary shall be 90 percent of the salary of the chief justice of the supreme judicial court.”  
369  SECTION 22. Said chapter 18C is hereby further amended by striking out section 4 and 
370 inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
371  “Section 4. Child advocate advisory board.  
372  The child advocate shall meet with the governor, the speaker of the house of 
373 representatives, the senate president, the attorney general, the state auditor, the chief justice of 
374 the trial court, and the chief justice of the juvenile court at least annually and shall present the 
375 annual goals of the office set by the child advocate and its plans for monitoring the work, 
376 including the continuous quality improvement, of executive agencies and the identification of 
377 any critical gaps and issues relating to interagency collaboration.”  
378  SECTION 23. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
379 subsection (a), in line 2, by inserting after the word “occurred” the following words:- 
380 Notification shall include the demographic information of the child, if known.  
381  SECTION 24. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
382 subsection (a), by striking out the word “he” and inserting in place thereof the following word, in 
383 each instance, in said section:- they 

19 of 52 384  SECTION 25. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
385 subsection (a) by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word, in 
386 each instance, in said section:- their 
387  SECTION 26. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
388 subsection (b), in line 18, by striking out the word “he” and interesting in place thereof the 
389 following word,:- they 
390  SECTION 27. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
391 subsection (b), in lines 16, 19, and 21 by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place 
392 thereof the following word:- their 
393  SECTION 28. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
394 subsection (b), in line 25, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
395 following words:- the office’s 
396  SECTION 29. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
397 subsection (c), in line 28, by striking out the word “him” and inserting in place thereof the 
398 following words:- the child advocate 
399  SECTION 30. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
400 by adding in subsection (d) after the phrase “access to behavioral health services,” the words: 
401 “access to support for parents or guardians of a child who has experienced a sudden unexpected 
402 death in pediatrics,” 
403  SECTION 31. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
404 adding the following subsection:-  

20 of 52 405  “(i) The child advocate shall notify the governor, the attorney general, the auditor, the 
406 speaker of the house of representatives and the senate president when conducting an 
407 investigation which the Child Advocate plans to release publicly due to a reasonable belief that 
408 an executive agency or constituent agency failed in its duty to protect or adequately serve a child. 
409 In order to ensure the integrity and independence of the office, the governor, the attorney 
410 general, the auditor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the senate president shall 
411 receive the final full report of such an investigation before any executive office, agency or 
412 program that is the subject of said investigation.”  
413  SECTION 32. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
414 adding the following subsections:- 
415  (j) The department shall inform the child advocate as soon as practicable when a foster 
416 care review safety alert is issued.  The office shall review the circumstances of that foster care 
417 review safety alert and provide feedback to the department on individual cases and trends in 
418 services.  
419  SECTION 33. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
420 striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- their 
421  SECTION 34. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
422 inserting, in line 8, after the words “access to” the following words:- all court records that the 
423 child advocate deems 
424  SECTION 35. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
425 inserting, in line 8, after the word “relevant” the following word:- including  

21 of 52 426  SECTION 36. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
427 inserting, in line 10, after the word “court” following words:- records held by the Massachusetts 
428 Probation Service, and records on adults and juveniles contained in the electronic information 
429 systems maintained by the department of criminal justice information services, including 
430 personally identifiable information if requested by the child advocate.  
431  SECTION 37. Section 9 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
432 striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- their 
433  SECTION 38. Section 10 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
434 inserting after the number “5” in line 7 the following words:- “,data described in section 2 of this 
435 chapter related to the mandated reporter training and website”.  
436  SECTION 39. Section 11 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
437 striking out section 11 in its entirety, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
438  Section 11. Examination of systemwide services  
439  The child advocate, in their independent role or in their role as chair of the Juvenile 
440 Justice Policy and Data Board, may examine systemwide challenges to the provision of adequate 
441 services to children. The child advocate may prioritize challenges that include multiple state 
442 agencies or secretariats and challenges that affect the most vulnerable children. Such systemwide 
443 examinations will include recommendations for improvements to the state system of services for 
444 children. The child advocate may utilize any source of information available to the office to 
445 make recommendations and may seek advice from individuals with expertise in relevant fields of 
446 work or study in preparing a report under this section. The child advocate shall file a report on 
447 any such examination with the governor, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, 

22 of 52 448 the senate and house committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children, families 
449 and persons with disabilities, and shall report on any such examination in the annual report 
450 pursuant to section 10. 
451  SECTION 40. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
452 subsection (a), in line 3, by inserting after the word “Notwithstanding” the following words:- 
453 sections 167 and 172 of chapter 6, 
454  SECTION 41. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
455 subsection (a), in line 12, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
456 following word:- their 
457  SECTION 42. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
458 subsection (b), in line 21, by inserting after the number “4” the following words:- and under 
459 chapter 66A 
460  SECTION 43. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
461 subsection (c), in line 23, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
462 following word:- the  
463   SECTION 44. Section 12 of chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by 
464 striking subsection (e), and inserting in place thereof:- 
465  (e) The restrictions of this section shall not preclude:  
466  (i) the child advocate from sharing with the governor, the attorney general, a district 
467 attorney, a secretary, an agency commissioner or other agency personnel, the speaker of the 
468 house of representatives, the senate president, or the chairs of the joint committee on children, 

23 of 52 469 families and persons with disabilities, the report of, or the results of, a critical incident 
470 investigation involving that agency. Any executive or legislative branch employees who receive 
471 such a document shall be bound by the confidentiality requirements of this section.  
472  (ii) the child advocate from sharing information with a state agency when the child 
473 advocate deems, in their sole discretion, that such information sharing is necessary for the child 
474 advocate to perform the child advocate’s duties. 
475  (iii) the child advocate from issuing a public report when such report, in the sole 
476 discretion of the child advocate, is necessary for the child advocate to perform the child 
477 advocates duties.  
478  SECTION 45. Section 13 of chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in line 5, 
479 by striking out the word “his” and replacing it therefore with the following word:- their  
480  SECTION 46. Chapter 18C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
481 inserting after section 14 the following section:  
482  Section 15: (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context 
483 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
484  “Child”, a person under the age of 18.  
485  “Fatality”, a death of a child.  
486  “Local team”, a local child fatality review team established in subsection (c).  
487  “Near fatality”, an act that, as certified by a physician, places a child in serious or critical 
488 condition.  

24 of 52 489  “State team”, the state child fatality review team established in subsection (b).  
490  “Team”, the state or a local team.  
491  “Office”, the office of the child advocate.  
492  (b) There shall be a state child fatality review team within the office. Notwithstanding 
493 section 172 of chapter 6, members of the state team shall be subject to criminal offender record 
494 checks to be conducted by the colonel of state police on behalf of the child advocate. All 
495 members shall serve without compensation for their duties associated with membership on the 
496 state team.  
497  The state team shall consist of not less than: (i) the child advocate, or designee, who shall 
498 serve as co-chair; (ii) the commissioner of public health, or designee, who shall serve as co-
499 chair; (iii) the chief medical examiner, or designee; (iv) the attorney general, or designee; (v) the 
500 commissioner of children and families, or designee; (vi) the commissioner of elementary and 
501 secondary education, or designee; (vii) a representative selected by the Massachusetts District 
502 Attorneys Association; (viii) the colonel of state police, or designee; (ix) the commissioner of 
503 mental health, or designee; (x) the commissioner of developmental services, or designee; (xi) the 
504 director of the Massachusetts Center for Unexpected Infant and Child Death at Boston Medical 
505 Center, or designee; (xii) the commissioner of youth services, or designee; (xiii) the 
506 commissioner of early education and care, or designee; (xiv) a representative selected by the 
507 Massachusetts chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics who has experience in diagnosing 
508 or treating child abuse and neglect; (xv) a representative selected by the Massachusetts Health 
509 and Hospital Association, Inc.; (xvi) the president of the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police 
510 Association Incorporated, or designee; (xvii) the Department of Children and Families Chapter 

25 of 52 511 President or designee of the certified collective bargaining representative of bargaining unit 8; 
512 and (xviii) any other person, selected by the co-chairs or by majority vote of the members of the 
513 state team, with expertise or information relevant to an individual case. The purpose of the state 
514 team shall be to decrease the incidence of preventable child fatalities and near fatalities by: (1) 
515 developing an understanding of the causes and incidence of child fatalities and near fatalities; 
516 and (2) advising the governor, the general court and the public by recommending changes in law, 
517 policy and practice to prevent child fatalities and near fatalities. The state team may consult with 
518 the chief justice of the juvenile court department of the trial court of the commonwealth on issues 
519 with a direct bearing upon the business of the Massachusetts courts.  
520  To achieve its purpose, the state team shall: (i) develop model investigative and data 
521 collection protocols for local teams; (ii) provide information to local teams and law enforcement 
522 agencies for the purpose of protecting children; (iii) provide training and written materials to 
523 local teams to assist them in carrying out their duties; (iv) review reports from local teams; (v) 
524 study the incidence and causes of child fatalities and near fatalities in the commonwealth; (vi) 
525 analyze community, public and private agency involvement with the children and their families 
526 prior to and subsequent to fatalities or near fatalities; (vii) develop a protocol for the collection of 
527 data regarding fatalities and near fatalities and provide training to local teams on the protocol; 
528 (viii) develop and implement rules and procedures necessary for its own operation; and (ix) 
529 provide the governor, the general court and the public with annual written reports, subject to 
530 confidentiality restrictions, that shall include, but not be limited to, the state team’s findings and 
531 recommendations.  
532  (c) There shall be a local child fatality review team in each district established under 
533 section 13 of chapter 12. Notwithstanding section 172 of chapter 6, members of a local team 

26 of 52 534 shall be subject to criminal offender record checks to be conducted by the district attorney. All 
535 members shall serve without compensation for their duties associated with membership on a 
536 local team.  
537  Each local team shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the district attorney of the county, 
538 who shall serve as chair; (ii) the chief medical examiner or, designee; (iii) the commissioner of 
539 children and families or, designee; (iv) a pediatrician with experience in diagnosing or treating 
540 child abuse and neglect, appointed by the state team; (v) a local police officer from a 
541 municipality where a child fatality or near fatality occurred, appointed by the chief of police of 
542 the municipality; (vi) a state law enforcement officer, appointed by the colonel of state police; 
543 (vii) the director of the Massachusetts Center for Unexpected Infant and Child Death located at 
544 Boston Medical Center or a designee; (viii) at least one representative from the department of 
545 public health (ix) at least one representative from the office of the child advocate; (x) a designee 
546 of the collective bargaining representative’s Department of Children and Families Chapter 
547 President who represents the region where the fatality occurred; and (xi) any other person with 
548 expertise or information relevant to an individual case who may attend meetings, on an ad hoc 
549 basis, by agreement of the permanent members of each local team; provided that such person 
550 may include, but shall not be limited to, a local or state law enforcement officer, a hospital 
551 representative, a medical specialist or subspecialist, or a designee of the commissioners of 
552 developmental services, mental health, youth services, education and early education and care.  
553  The purpose of each local team shall be to decrease the incidence of preventable child 
554 fatalities and near fatalities by: (i) coordinating the collection of information on fatalities and 
555 near fatalities; (ii) promoting cooperation and coordination between agencies responding to 
556 fatalities and near fatalities and in providing services to family members; (iii) developing an 

27 of 52 557 understanding of the causes and incidence of child fatalities and near fatalities in the county; and 
558 (iv) advising the state team on changes in law, policy or practice that may affect child fatalities 
559 and near fatalities.  
560  To achieve its purpose, each local team shall: (i) review, establish and implement model 
561 protocols from the state team; (ii) review, subject to the approval of the local district attorney, all 
562 individual fatalities and near fatalities in accordance with the established protocols; (iii) meet 
563 periodically, not less than 2 times per calendar year, to review the status of fatality and near 
564 fatality cases and recommend methods of improving coordination of services between member 
565 agencies; (iv) collect, maintain and provide confidential data as required by the state team; and 
566 (v) provide law enforcement or other agencies with information to protect children.  
567  At the request of the local district attorney, the local team shall be immediately provided 
568 with: (i) information and records relevant to the cause of the fatality or near fatality maintained 
569 by providers of medical or other care, treatment or services, including dental and mental health 
570 care; (ii) information and records relevant to the cause of the fatality or near fatality maintained 
571 by any state, county or local government agency including, but not limited to, birth certificates, 
572 medical examiner investigative data, parole and probation information records and law 
573 enforcement data post-disposition, except that certain law enforcement records may be exempted 
574 by the local district attorney; (iii) information and records of any provider of social services, 
575 including the department of children and families, relevant to the child or the child's family, that 
576 the local team deems relevant to the review; and (iv) demographic information relevant to the 
577 child and the child's immediate family, including, but not limited to, address, age, race, gender 
578 and economic status. The district attorney may enforce this paragraph by seeking an order of the 
579 superior court.  

28 of 52 580  (d) Any privilege or restriction on disclosure established pursuant to chapter 66A, section 
581 70 of chapter 111, section 11 of chapter 111B, section 18 of chapter 111E, chapter 112, chapter 
582 123, section 20B, section 20J or section 20K of chapter 233 or any other law relating to 
583 confidential communications shall not prohibit the disclosure of this information to the chair of 
584 the state team or a local team. Any information considered to be confidential pursuant to the 
585 aforementioned statutes may be submitted for a team’s review upon the determination of that 
586 team’s chair that the review of this information is necessary. The chair shall ensure that no 
587 information submitted for a team’s review is disseminated to parties outside the team. No 
588 member of a team shall violate the confidentiality provisions set forth in the aforementioned 
589 statutes.  
590  Except as necessary to carry out a team’s purpose and duties, members of a team and 
591 persons attending a team meeting shall not disclose any information relating to the team’s 
592 business.  
593  Team meetings shall be closed to the public. Information and records acquired by the 
594 state team or by a local team pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential, exempt from 
595 disclosure under chapter 66 and may only be disclosed as necessary to carry out a team’s duties 
596 and purposes.  
597  Statistical compilations of data that do not contain any information that would permit the 
598 identification of any person may be disclosed to the public.  
599  (e) Members of a team, persons attending a team meeting and persons who present 
600 information to a team shall not be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding 
601 information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a team meeting.  

29 of 52 602  (f) Information, documents and records of the state team or of a local team shall not be 
603 subject to subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding; 
604 provided, however, that information, documents and records otherwise available from any other 
605 source shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence through 
606 these sources solely because they were presented during proceedings of a team or are maintained 
607 by a team.  
608  (g) Nothing in this section shall limit the powers and duties of the child advocate or 
609 district attorneys.  
610  SECTION 47. Said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding 
611 the following section:- 
612    Section 16. The office shall, every three years, oversee the review of child welfare 
613 data reporting and make recommendations for improvements to the report and profile required 
614 under subsections (b) and (c) of section 26 of chapter 18B and any other legislatively mandated 
615 reports, or the data measures, progress measures, and outcome measures pursuant to section 128 
616 of chapter 47 of the acts of 2017. Following the release of the department’s annual report, the 
617 office shall seek input from the public, advocates and diverse stakeholders from across the 
618 commonwealth. The office shall consult with other individuals with relevant expertise, including 
619 academics, researchers and service providers. Following such review, the office shall post a 
620 report on its recommendations, together with drafts of any legislation necessary to carry its 
621 recommendations into effect and an aggregate response to the comments raised during the 
622 comment period on the Office of the Child Advocate’s website.    

30 of 52 623  SECTION 48. Section 2A of chapter 38 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
624 official edition, is hereby repealed.  
625  SECTION 49. Said Chapter 38, as so appearing, is here by amended by adding the 
626 following section:- 
627  Section 14. Sudden unexpected death in pediatrics.  
628  (a) In all cases of sudden unexpected death in pediatrics, the office shall provide the 
629 caregivers of the deceased with information from the office of the child advocate, including a list 
630 of publicly available services for sudden unexpected death in pediatrics as well as information 
631 about how to receive support from the office of the child advocate in accordance with M.G.L. 
632 18C § 5 (d). The office of the chief medical examiner shall provide this list to the caregivers of 
633 the deceased no later than three (3) days after receipt of the decedent.  
634  (b) The office in coordination with the department of public shall provide, as close to the 
635 time of incident as possible, information provided by the office of the child advocate, including a 
636 list of publicly available services as well as information about how to receive support from the 
637 office of the child advocate in accordance with M.G.L. 18C § 5 (d). 
638  SECTION 50. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official 
639 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 51L the following section: 
640  51M. Training for hospital and emergency personnel in sudden and unexpected death in 
641 pediatrics.  
642  (a) the department shall train emergency service and hospital personnel on providing 
643 information to caregivers of a child who has experiences sudden unexpected death in pediatrics, 

31 of 52 644 as defined in M.G.L 18C §1, about how to receive support from the office of the child advocate 
645 in accordance with M.G.L 18C §5(d).  
646  SECTION 51. Subsection (f) of section 23 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as 
647 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the sixth sentence.  
648  SECTION 52. Subsection (h) of said section 23 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is 
649 hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph.  
650  SECTION 53. Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
651 inserting after section 23C the following section:-   
652  Section 23D. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
653 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-   
654  “Child” means any child, youth or young adult who is under the custody, care or 
655 responsibility of the department.  
656  “Child-specific family” means a family that includes a non-relative (i) who is significant 
657 in a particular child’s life, or (ii) to whom the child and/or parent(s) ascribe the role of family 
658 based on cultural and affectional ties or individual family values.  
659  “Department” means the Department of Children and Families.  
660  (b) The department shall present a document listing the rights enumerated in subsection 
661 (d) to the parent(s) of each child in its care, the foster parent(s) of each child in its care and each 
662 child in its care, or where developmentally appropriate, the child’s attorney, when the child 
663 enters care and at other times the department deems appropriate. Within 3 months of the 
664 effective date of this statute, the department shall create a simple and plain language version of 

32 of 52 665 these rights as they are enumerated below so that they are accessible and easily understood by 
666 children and youth in care. This simple and plain language version shall be created with the 
667 participation of lived experience community members. The department shall explain these rights 
668 to the child in a developmentally appropriate way when the child enters the department’s care. 
669 The department shall ensure the document is translated into the language spoken by the child, the 
670 child’s parent and the foster parent(s). The document shall be posted in all congregate care 
671 facilities in a public space where all residents have access, prominently on its website and in all 
672 area offices. The department shall present the document for continual use to the child’s attorney 
673 and parent(s) and display the document prominently on its website and in all area offices.   
674  (c) The department shall amend any regulations or policies that may conflict with this 
675 section in a timely fashion.  
676  (d) Each child has the following rights:   
677  (1) Safety and Security:  
678  (i) Each child shall be treated with dignity, respect and consideration, and has the right to 
679 have their privacy respected. 
680  (ii) Each child has the right not to be discriminated against, physically hurt or harassed by 
681 department staff, foster parents, the child’s attorney or service providers on the basis of religion, 
682 race, color, creed, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, 
683 age, disability, culture, language or ethnicity.   
684  (iii) Each child has the right to a placement that is gender-affirming and free from 
685 physical, psychological, sexual, emotional or other abuse, neglect or exploitation.   

33 of 52 686  (iv) Each child has the right to access personal possessions, personal space and privacy 
687 with allowance for safety.  
688  (v) Each child has the right to autonomy of all pictures, taken by any individual, of 
689 themselves as appropriate.   
690  (vi) Each child has the right to access sufficient healthy food, clothing, personal care 
691 products and items that preserve and promote the child's family's religion and culture and that of 
692 the child’s family and the child’s gender-identity as well as the child’s specific hair and body 
693 needs.   
694  (vii) Each child has the right to be placed in a safe and nurturing environment and receive 
695 appropriate care and treatment in the least restrictive setting available that can meet the child’s 
696 needs and addresses their trauma history. The environment shall include the child’s culture, 
697 religion and identity as nearly as possible to the home of origin.  
698  (viii) Each child has the right not to be placed, housed or detained in a secure department 
699 of youth services placement based on the department of children and families’ inability to 
700 provide an available and appropriate foster placement. The department shall not advocate for bail 
701 of any amount for children in its care or custody.   
702  (ix) Each child has the right to developmentally appropriate information about a foster 
703 family or program prior to being placed whenever possible and, whenever possible and 
704 appropriate, shall have an opportunity to meet the foster parent or program staff before 
705 placement occurs. If the foster placement is only able to accommodate the child for a limited 
706 time, the child shall be notified of the anticipated duration of the child’s stay with that foster 
707 placement. The child shall be informed of a placement change and the reason(s) for the change at 

34 of 52 708 least 5 days in advance whenever possible. When a change is made in an emergency 
709 circumstance, the child shall be given as much notice as possible. The child’s attorney shall be 
710 notified simultaneously. The child’s belongings shall be packed with care and the child shall be 
711 allowed to bring their essential belongings and comfort items with them.    
712  (2) Connections to Family, Community and Identity:  
713  (i) Each child has the right to know, understand, learn about and develop the child’s 
714 racial, cultural, linguistic, gender, religious and ethnic identity, including but not limited to 
715 clothing, hair, other cultural expressions of identity and body care and to a placement that will 
716 provide or maintain the connections necessary to preserve and promote the child’s identities.  
717  (ii) To the best of the department’s ability, each child has the right to preserve and 
718 maintain all languages the child entered care speaking and to reside in a placement that provides 
719 or facilitates appropriate language access. 
720  (iii) Each child has the right to be placed according to the child’s gender identity and 
721 referred to by the name and gender pronouns preferred by the child. A child’s sexual orientation 
722 and gender identity and expression shall remain private unless the child permits the information 
723 to be disclosed, the disclosure is required to protect the child’s health and safety, or disclosure is 
724 compelled by law or a court order.   
725  (iv) Each child has the right to a placement identified and located through due diligence 
726 and that prioritizes the child’s parents, relatives and child-specific family, using full and fair 
727 consideration, as potential placement providers. The child’s parents shall be considered first, 
728 then relatives and then child-specific family.    

35 of 52 729  (v) Each child has the right to prioritization of placement with the child’s siblings or half-
730 siblings in all settings and permanency plans, including but not limited to foster care, congregate 
731 care, and adoption, unless the joint placement is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the 
732 siblings. The department shall work to address barriers to placing siblings together, including the 
733 recruitment and retention of foster and adoptive parents able to parent sibling groups. The 
734 department shall ensure that the child be placed in as close proximity as possible to siblings if 
735 unable to be placed in the same setting, and shall facilitate frequent and meaningful contact 
736 regardless of geographic barriers, if it is not harmful to the safety and well-being of each sibling.  
737  (vi) Each child has the right to family time of a duration and frequency and in a setting 
738 that (A) is consistent with the developmental or clinical needs of the child and (B) promotes and 
739 preserves their connections with their family. Family time shall take place in person or outside of 
740 a department office whenever possible.  
741  (vii) Each child has the right to other forms of parental contact, including but not limited 
742 to mail, phone calls, videoconferences, email and texts if they have their own phone and if not 
743 harmful to the safety or well-being of the child. All placements, including congregate care 
744 programs, shall facilitate access to virtual forms of contact.   
745  (viii) Each child has the right to assistance to maintain positive contact with other family 
746 members and significant other positive relationships in the child’s life, including but not limited 
747 to teachers, friends and community individuals.     
748  (ix) Each child has the right to be treated as a family member in a foster family and, 
749 whenever possible, be included in a foster family’s activities, holidays and traditions taking into 
750 consideration factors that include but are not limited to the child’s age and trauma history. Each 

36 of 52 751 child shall have the opportunity to be included in the daily activities of the family to maintain the 
752 most normal daily routine and environment as possible.  
753  (3) Health Care and Accessibility:  
754  (i) Each child has the right to access appropriate, timely and gender-affirming medical, 
755 reproductive, dental, vision, mental and behavioral health services regularly and more often as 
756 needed.  
757  (ii) Each child has the right to discuss any questions or concerns the child has relating to 
758 medication or other physical, mental or behavioral health treatment with a healthcare provider 
759 and to understand the medications and/or treatment provided, its purposes and side effects in a 
760 developmentally appropriate way.   
761  (iii) Each child has the right to out-of-home placements with reasonable accommodations 
762 for any disabilities the child may have, consistent with state and federal law. Reasonable 
763 accommodation(s) will be provided in a timely manner and in such a way as to protect the 
764 privacy of the child. Each child also has a right to discuss any disabilities with the department 
765 and request adaptive equipment, auxiliary aids or services.  
766  (4) Education, Employment and Social Connections:  
767  (i) Each child has the right to attend school regularly, to educational stability, to 
768 educational supports and to an education that meets their needs under federal and state law.  
769  (ii) Each child has the right for the department to prioritize school stability by (A) placing 
770 children as close to home as possible and, (B) maintaining the child at their school of origin 

37 of 52 771 unless it is found, in a Best Interest Determination (BID) meeting pursuant to federal law, not to 
772 be in their best interest to do so.   
773  (iii) Each child has the right to participate in developmentally appropriate school, 
774 extracurricular, enrichment, religious, cultural, linguistic, ethnic and social activities and to have 
775 any placement provider use the reasonable and prudent parenting standard when making 
776 decisions regarding participation in such activities.   
777  (iv) Each child has the right to achieve developmentally and religiously appropriate, age-
778 related milestones, including but not limited to obtaining a driver’s license, opening bank 
779 accounts, birthday celebrations, religious ceremonies or graduations.  
780  (v) Each child has the right to be informed of and supported in accessing all available 
781 services through the department, including but not limited to educational, vocational and 
782 employment services, assistance in acquiring life skills, educational assistance including but not 
783 limited to tuition and fee waivers for post-secondary education, financial support, housing 
784 support, assistance with credit reports and resolving inaccuracies, training and career guidance to 
785 accomplish personal goals and prepare for the future, employment supports available to children 
786 in care and adaptive equipment or auxiliary aids and supports.  
787  (vii) Each child has the right to developmentally appropriate education on financial 
788 preparedness, job readiness, appropriate use of social media, education options, healthy 
789 relationships, physical, mental, sexual and reproductive health.  
790  (5) Resources and Supports:   

38 of 52 791  (i) Each child has the right to reasonable access to a caseworker who can make case plan 
792 decisions and shall include the opportunity for the child to have private conversations regarding 
793 any questions, grievances or concerns. Reasonable access shall include the department’s social 
794 worker and supervisor’s office telephone numbers and email addresses as well as, at a minimum, 
795 monthly visits by the department. The department shall also provide the child an emergency 
796 contact number for a department staff member who can make decisions and take action with 
797 respect to the child during non-business hours.   
798  (ii) Each child has the right to participate as developmentally appropriate in the 
799 development and review of the action plans and family time and visitation plans, their 
800 Individualized Education Program and Best Interest Determination and shall be consulted as the 
801 department formulates or updates said items. Children aged 14 and older shall also be presented 
802 with the action or service plan for their review, written feedback and signature. A child has the 
803 right to request that their foster parent(s) participate at foster care reviews and to object to their 
804 participation if a child does not want them to attend.  
805  (iii) Each child has the right to be informed, in a developmentally appropriate way, of the 
806 meaning of all documents that they are asked to sign by the department and/or its 
807 agents/contractors/providers including the Voluntary Agreement for Placement and documents 
808 of similar importance. A child shall have their attorney present whenever asked to sign any 
809 documents by the department or its agents/contractors/providers, or the document shall be 
810 provided in a timely fashion to the child’s attorney to give an opportunity for review in advance 
811 of presenting it for signature.  

39 of 52 812  (iv) Each child has the right to be informed in a developmentally appropriate way of the 
813 reason(s) the department became involved with the child’s family, why the child came into care 
814 and why the child is still in care. The department shall offer support through the review process 
815 to address any possible trauma caused by a child’s access to their case files. Upon turning 18, the 
816 youth will have the right to access their case files, barring any confidential or legally privileged 
817 information.   
818  (v) Each child aged 14 or older has the right to be included in foster care review 
819 meetings, permanency hearings and lead agency team meetings except for those parts that 
820 involve information that is confidential regarding a previous or future adoptive, kinship or foster 
821 parent under federal or state law, and unless documented by court order that participation would 
822 be detrimental to the child. The department shall provide that child the ability to offer input to 
823 the department before a final decision is made with respect to determining or changing 
824 placement or permanency. If the child is unable to attend in person, by phone or video, the child 
825 shall have the right to submit a written statement to be considered at the meeting or hearing.  
826  (vi) Each child has the right to department-provided adequate notice of all court hearings. 
827 To the extent possible, the notice shall include the date, time and location of the hearing. The 
828 department shall ensure the child understands the child’s right to attend court hearings and speak 
829 to the judge regarding any decision that may have an impact on the child’s life.   
830  (vii) Each child has the right to access their medical, dental and educational records held 
831 by the department as well as their personal documents, including but not limited to social 
832 security card, birth certificate, health insurance information, state identification card, driver’s 
833 license, passport      and documentation related to their immigration status, including work 

40 of 52 834 authorization in a developmentally appropriate way. When a child leaves the care of the 
835 department, they shall be given copies of medical, dental and educational records held by the 
836 department and original copies of all personal documents.  
837  (viii) If a minor who is aging out of care and is seeking to change their name and/or 
838 gender marker on relevant legal documents to affirm their gender identity, before the child ages 
839 out of care, the department’s attorney must ensure that all relevant legal documents, including 
840 birth certificate, social security card, state identification card, driver’s license, passport and 
841 immigration documentation are updated and corrected before the child departs care. This shall 
842 also apply to children in the permanent custody of the department whose parents have had their 
843 rights terminated. The department must further provide contact information for providers who 
844 are currently providing care for the child. The department shall begin planning to return the 
845 documents to the child at least 30 days before the child leaves care to be able to give the 
846 documents to the child on the day of the child’s departure. As soon as a child in the department’s 
847 care is eligible the department must assist the child in obtaining a state identification card if the 
848 child does not have one and wants one.  
849  (ix) Each child has the right to an attorney when the department seeks custody of the 
850 child and to meaningful contact with said attorney including at foster care reviews. Each child 
851 shall be informed, when appropriate, by the department of the name and phone numbers of the 
852 assigned attorney. Each child, child’s parent and foster parent shall be informed, when 
853 appropriate, by the department that the child can contact the child’s attorney, and of the 
854 processes to file a complaint regarding the child’s attorney and to request a change of attorney 
855 for the child. The department’s attorney shall notify the child’s attorney of each child’s 

41 of 52 856 placement address and phone number no later than 24 hours after the time of placement or 
857 placement change.   
858  (x) A child over the age of 14 who has a bank account may receive direct payment from 
859 the department through their attorney or the department upon request.  
860  (xi) Each child, and their attorney, has the right to be informed if the department applies 
861 for any benefits on behalf of the child, including but not limited to benefits under Title XVI of 
862 the Social Security Act, also referred to as “Supplemental Security Income;" benefits under Title 
863 II of the Social Security Act, also referred to as “Retirement, Survivors or Disability Benefits,” 
864 and if the department applies to be the representative payee for such benefits. The department 
865 shall preserve all of such funds received in an interest-bearing account belonging to the child so 
866 the funds are available for the child’s benefit and use while they are in care, and the child’s use 
867 when they turn 18. The department shall not use such funds for the customary costs of foster 
868 care, nor shall it use such funds to pay the costs of items which would ordinarily be funded by 
869 another source. If necessary, the department shall preserve said funds in an ABLE (Achieving a 
870 Better Life Experience) account authorized by Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 
871 1986, or another trust account for the child determined not to interfere with SSI or asset 
872 limitations for any other benefit program. Each child, and their attorney, shall have the right to 
873 be informed by the department if they stop receiving said benefits, or are no longer eligible to 
874 receive them.  
875  (6) Transition Age Youth  
876  (i) Each child, age 14 or older, has the right to collaborate with the department to plan 
877 their transition from foster care to adulthood. Transition planning should cover all areas needed 

42 of 52 878 for a youth to be stable and successful as an adult, including but not limited to, planning for visits 
879 and/or contact with parents and siblings; building relationships with other caring adults, 
880 particularly with life-long connections; making an education plan including post-secondary 
881 education; finding vocational, employment and career counseling and placement; securing stable 
882 housing; developing expertise in daily living skills; maintaining physical, reproductive and 
883 mental health care and health insurance; learning how to access community resources and public 
884 benefits and services; connecting with other state agencies; developing financial skills including 
885 but not limited to, understanding budgeting and money management as well as checking and 
886 savings accounts;  and receiving, understanding and correcting, if applicable, the child’s 
887 consumer credit report. The department shall provide all associated services and supports 
888 necessary for such planning.   
889  (ii) Each child, who turns 18 while in the custody of the department, has the right to 
890 continue under the responsibility of the department and receive young adult services until turning 
891 23, pursuant to federal requirements. Each child has the right to be offered a Voluntary 
892 Placement Agreement by the department in the month prior to their turning 18 years old. The 
893 Voluntary Placement Agreement shall be developed together with the child during permanency 
894 and transition planning. Each child has the right to be made aware of this right and any federal 
895 requirements governing services for transition age youth throughout the transition planning 
896 process. 
897  (iii) Each child has the right to a transition plan at least one year prior to turning 18 years 
898 old crafted by the department at the direction of the transition age youth, regardless whether they 
899 will continue under the responsibility of the department upon turning 18, that includes 
900 personalized, detailed, tangible, available and clear options for resources for meeting their basic 

43 of 52 901 needs including, but not limited to, housing, education and vocational supports which fulfill the 
902 requirements of 42 U.S.C. s.675 (5)(H), as amended.    
903  (iv) Each child aged 18 and older, who has chosen to remain under the responsibility of 
904 the department has the right to engage and re-engage with the department under a Voluntary 
905 Placement Agreement at any time for any reason.  
906  (v) Each child has the right to all department-identified, appropriate housing 
907 opportunities available to a youth turning 18, a young adult leaving the care of the department 
908 after the age of 18 and a youth who re-enters the department. 
909  (vi) Each child has the right not to be made homeless or redirected to shelter by the 
910 department upon said child turning age 18.       
911  (7) Remedies  
912  (i) Each child has the right to have these rights enforced. The department shall not 
913 retaliate against or punish a child for asserting their rights. 
914  Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies 
915 of any person under any other federal or state law. 
916  (ii) Each child has the right to department-provided contact information for the 
917 ombudsperson, the office of the child advocate and the court when they enter the care and 
918 custody of the department and upon request. If it is developmentally inappropriate to provide the 
919 child with such information, a child’s attorney may be provided with this contact information. 
920  (iii) Each child has the right, if the child, the child’s parent, the child’s attorney, the 
921 child’s social worker or the child’s foster parent or placement provider believes any of the above 

44 of 52 922 rights have been violated, to discuss the alleged violation with the department’s ombudsman, file 
923 a complaint with the office of the child advocate, and those with appropriate standing, may 
924 request a fair hearing or petition the Juvenile or Probate and Family Court for a determination 
925 and enforcement of these rights. The department shall not retaliate against or punish a child, a 
926 child’s parent, an attorney, a social worker, a foster parent or placement provider for asserting 
927 this right. If the department, ombudsman, the office of the child advocate or the court determines 
928 the child's rights have been violated, the department shall resolve the violation as soon as 
929 practicable and make corrections so that the violation does not occur again.   
930  (e) The rights enumerated in subsection (d) shall be obligations of the department.  
931  (f) The rights enumerated in subsection (d) are not an exhaustive list of rights to which 
932 children under the custody, care or responsibility of the department are entitled and should not be 
933 read to limit the rights of children, or the responsibilities of the department in any way. 
934  (g) The commissioner of the department of children and families, in consultation with the 
935 office of the child advocate, shall submit an annual report to the house and senate committees on 
936 ways and means, the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the 
937 house and senate clerks’ offices on the number and types of complaints or alleged violations 
938 received pursuant to this act, as well as the nature of the complaints and/or alleged violations.  
939  (h) Not less than every 5 years, the commissioner of the department of children and 
940 families, in consultation with the office of the child advocate, shall submit a report to the house 
941 and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children, families and persons 
942 with disabilities and the house and senate clerks’ offices on the costs of fulfilling the rights 
943 outlined in subsection (d).  

45 of 52 944       SECTION 54. Section 29 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
945 hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraphs:  
946  No later than the third business days after, or until the departments attorney portal with 
947 automated notifications is finalized, any non-emergency change in a child’s or a young adult’s 
948 placement or any non-emergency hospitalization, and no later than three business day after any 
949 emergency change in a child’s or a young adult’s placement or any emergency hospitalization, 
950 the department shall provide notice of the change in placement or hospitalization to the child’s or 
951 the young adult’s attorney.  
952  No later than the third business day thereafter, or until the department's attorney portal 
953 with automated notifications is finalized, the department shall provide notice to a child’s attorney 
954 if it receives a report under section 51A and the child is the subject of the report. No later than 
955 the third business day thereafter, the department shall provide notice to a child’s attorney or a 
956 young adult’s attorney if it receives a report under section 51A that raises substantial questions 
957 regarding the suitability of the child’s or young adult’s current placement or any of the child’s or 
958 young adult’s service providers.  
959  No later than three business days thereafter, the department shall provide notice to a 
960 child’s or young adult’s attorney whenever it becomes aware of: (1) the child or young adult 
961 being arrested; (2) the child’s or young adult’s involvement in any proceeding under this chapter 
962 or any criminal investigation or proceeding; (3) the child or young adult being suspended from 
963 school; or (4) the child or young adult being the subject of any proceeding regarding his or her 
964 suspension or expulsion from school.  

46 of 52 965  SECTION 55. Section 39½ of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
966 striking out the eighth paragraph.  
967  SECTION 56. Section 51A of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
968 hereby amended by striking out subsection (k) and inserting in place thereof the following 
969 subsection:-  
970  (k) A mandated reporter who is professionally licensed by the commonwealth shall, 
971 within 180 days of operating within a professional capacity that qualifies as a mandated reporter, 
972 complete training to recognize and report suspected child abuse and neglect, including child 
973 sexual abuse. The training shall have a curriculum that has been approved by the child advocate. 
974 Mandated reporters shall complete said training at least every two years, for so long as they 
975 continue to engage in professional activities that qualify them as mandated reporters.  
976  SECTION 57. Section 51D of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
977 striking out the eighth paragraph.  
978  SECTION 58. Section 51E of said chapter 119, as appearing, is hereby amended by 
979 striking out, in line 2, the figure “51D” and inserting place thereof the following figure:- “51C”. 
980  SECTION 59. Chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
981 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-  
982  Section 9A.  Orders Protecting Minors. 
983   Any on behalf of order or order relative to minor children, remains in effect after the 
984 minor reaches the age of majority unless otherwise ordered by the court. Upon reaching the age 
985 of majority, the plaintiff may appear at court on the date and time the order is to expire, and the 

47 of 52 986 court shall determine whether or not to extend the order for any additional time reasonably 
987 necessary to protect the plaintiff or to enter a permanent order. 
988  SECTION 60. Section 5E of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
989 Official Edition is hereby repealed.  
990  SECTION 61. Chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
991 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:- 
992  Section 11A. Orders Protecting Minors.  
993  Any order issues on behalf of a minor remains in effect after the minor reaches the 
994 majority unless otherwise ordered by the court. Upon reaching the age of majority, the plaintiff 
995 may appear at court on the date and time the order is to expire, and the court shall determine 
996 whether or not to extend the order for any additional time reasonably necessary to protect the 
997 plaintiff and enter a permanent order.  
998   SECTION 62. Item 4800-0015 of section 2 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023 is hereby 
999 amended by striking out the words “provided further, that on December 1, 2022, and March 1, 
1000 2023, the department shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the 
1001 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities on: (i) the fair hearing 
1002 requests filed in fiscal year 2023, using nonidentifying information which shall state, for each 
1003 hearing request: (a) the subject matter of the appeal; (b) the number of days between the hearing 
1004 request and the first day of the hearing; (c) the number of days between the first day of the 
1005 hearing and the hearing officer’s decision; (d) the number of days between the hearing officer’s 
1006 decision and the agency’s final decision; (e) the number of days of continuance granted at the 
1007 appellant’s request; (f) the number of days of continuance granted at the request of the 

48 of 52 1008 department of children and families or the hearing officer’s request, specifying which party made 
1009 the request; and (g) whether the department’s decision that was the subject of the appeal was 
1010 affirmed or reversed; and (ii) the fair hearing requests filed before fiscal year 2023, which have 
1011 been pending for more than 180 days, stating the number of those cases, how many of those 
1012 cases have been heard but not decided and how many have been decided by the hearing officer 
1013 but not yet issued as a final agency decision; provided further, that the department shall maintain 
1014 and make available to the public, during regular business hours, a record of its fair hearings, with 
1015 identifying information removed, including for each hearing request: the date of the request, the 
1016 date of the hearing decision, the decision rendered by the hearing officer and the final decision 
1017 rendered upon the commissioner’s review; provided further, that the department shall make 
1018 redacted copies of fair hearing decisions available within 30 days of a written request; provided 
1019 further, that the department shall not make available any information in violation of federal 
1020 privacy regulations; provided further, that not later than March 1, 2023, the department shall 
1021 submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and joint committee on 
1022 children, families and persons with disabilities that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (1) 
1023 number of medical and psychiatric personnel and their level of training currently employed by or 
1024 under contract with the department; (2) number of foster care reviews conducted by the 
1025 department and the average length of time in which each review is completed; (3) the number of 
1026 social workers and supervisors who have earned a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social work; 
1027 (4) the total number of social workers and the total number of social workers holding licensure, 
1028 by level; (5) number of the department’s contracts reviewed by the state auditor and the number 
1029 of corrective action plans issued; and (6) number of corrective action plans entered into by the 
1030 department; provided further, that on the first business day of each quarter, the department shall 

49 of 52 1031 file a report with the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee 
1032 on children, families and persons with disabilities on the caseload of the department; provided 
1033 further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to: (A) the caseloads of residential 
1034 placements, congregate care, foster care, therapeutic foster care, adoption, guardianship, 51A 
1035 reports, substantiated 51A reports, the number of children who die in the care and custody of the 
1036 department, the number of children currently eligible for supportive child care, the number of 
1037 children presently receiving supportive child care and the number of medical and psychiatric 
1038 consultation requests made by the department’s social workers; (B) the number of approved 
1039 foster care placements; (C) the number of children in psychiatric hospitals and community-based 
1040 acute treatment programs who remain hospitalized beyond their medically-necessary stay while 
1041 awaiting placement and the number of days each case remains in placement beyond that which is 
1042 medically necessary; (D) the number of children under the department of children and families’ 
1043 care and custody who are being served in medical or psychiatric care provided through other 
1044 publicly-funded sources; (E) the number of children served by supervised visitation centers and 
1045 the number of those children who are reunified with their families; (F) the total number of 
1046 children served, their ages, the number of children served in each service plan, the number of 
1047 children in out-of-home placements and the number of placements each child has had before 
1048 receiving an out-of-home placement; (G) for each area office, the number of kinship 
1049 guardianship subsidies provided in the quarters covered by the report and the number of kinship 
1050 guardianship subsidies provided in that quarter for which federal reimbursement was received; 
1051 (H) for each area office, the total spending on services other than case management services 
1052 provided to families to keep a child with the child’s parents or reunifying the child with the 
1053 child’s parents, spending by the type of service including, but not limited to, the number of 

50 of 52 1054 children and a breakdown of spending for respite care, intensive in-home services, client 
1055 financial assistance and flexible funding, community-based after-school social and recreation 
1056 program services, family navigation services and parent aide services and the unduplicated 
1057 number of families that receive the services; (I) for each area office, the total number of families 
1058 residing in shelters paid for by the department, a list of where the families are sheltered, the total 
1059 cost and average cost per family at those shelters and a description of how the department 
1060 determines who qualifies or does not qualify for a shelter; (J) for each area office, the number of 
1061 requests for voluntary services, broken down by type of service requested, whether the request 
1062 was approved or denied, the number of families that were denied voluntary services and received 
1063 a 51A report, the reasons for denying the service and what, if any, referrals were made for 
1064 services by other agencies or entities; (K) the number of families receiving multiple 51A reports 
1065 within a 10-month period, the number of cases reopened within 6 months of being closed and the 
1066 number of children who return home and then reenter an out-of-home placement within 6 
1067 months; (L) the number of children and families served by the family resource centers by area; 
1068 and (M) the number of children within the care and custody of the department whose 
1069 whereabouts are unknown; provided further, that not later than January 31, 2023, the department 
1070 shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint 
1071 committee on children, families and persons with disabilities that details any changes to said 
1072 rules, regulations or guidelines established by the department in the previous fiscal year to carry 
1073 out its duties under chapter 119 of the General Laws including, but not limited to: (I) criteria 
1074 used to determine whether a child has been abused or neglected; (II) guidelines for removal of a 
1075 child from the home; and (III) standards to determine what reasonable efforts are being made to 
1076 keep a child in the home; provided further, that on a monthly basis, the department shall provide 

51 of 52 1077 the caseload forecasting office with data on children receiving services and other pertinent data 
1078 related to items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041 that is requested by the office; provided further, that 
1079 the report shall also contain the number of children and families served by the family resource 
1080 centers, by area, and an evaluation of the services provided and their effectiveness.”  
1081  SECTION 63. (a) There shall be established a special commission to provide 
1082 recommendations on rules, regulations, timelines, and processes for the enrollment of a child in 
1083 the department of children and families’ custody to a new school district, including but not 
1084 limited to, the timely transfer of relevant records and documentation. The recommendations shall 
1085 include, but not be limited to: proposed rules, regulations, and statuary changes needed to 
1086 implement the commission’s recommendations.  
1087  (b) The special commission shall consist of: the commissioner of the department of 
1088 elementary and secondary education or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the 
1089 commissioner of the department of children and families or a designee, who shall serve as co-
1090 chair; the chairs of the joint committee on children, families, and persons with disabilities; 1 
1091 member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the 
1092 president of the senate; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the house of 
1093 representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed 
1094 by the governor, who shall have experience as a foster parent; the child advocate, or designee; 1 
1095 member appointed by the committee on public council services; 1 member appointed by the 
1096 Massachusetts Association of Superintendents; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts 
1097 Teachers Association; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Schools Mental Health 
1098 Consortium; 1 member appointed by the bryt team of the Brookline Center for Community 
1099 Mental Health; 1 member appointed by the parent professional advocacy league; 1 member 

52 of 52 1100 appointed by More than Words, Inc.; and 1 member appointed by Citizens for Juvenile Justice 
1101 Inc.  
1102  (c) Not later than December 31, 2026, the commission shall file its recommendations 
1103 with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the joint committee on 
1104 education and the chairs of the joint committee on children, families, and persons with 
1105 disabilities.  
1106  (d) Not later than 180 days after the commission files its recommendations, the 
1107 department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the department children 
1108 and families, shall promulgate rules and regulations or issue any required guidance to implement 
1109 the recommendations of the commission that do not require statutory changes.  
1110   SECTION 64. The first report required by subsection (h) of section 23D of chapter 119 
1111 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 53 of this act, shall be completed and submitted no 
1112 later than December 31, 2026.  
1113  SECTION 65. The department shall complete the attorney portal referenced in Section 54 
1114 within 1 year of this act’s passage.  
1115  SECTION 66. Section 62 shall take effect as of July 1st, 2026.